Idaho, session 2025, H0157.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 25, Title 19, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 19-2512A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
19-2512A. COLLECTION OF DNA SAMPLE AND THUMBPRINT IMPRESSION. At the
time of sentencing, the court shall order the collection of a DNA sample and
thumbprint impression from any person who is convicted of, or pleads guilty
to, any serious crime as defined in section 19-5502(10), Idaho Code, accord-
ing to the process set forth in section 19-5507, Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. That Section 19-5501, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
19-5501. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS -- STATEMENT OF PURPOSE. The legisla-
ture finds that DNA (deoxyribonucleic acid) identification analysis is a
useful law enforcement tool for identifying and prosecuting felony offend-
ers who have committed serious crimes, as defined in this chapter, and that
it is in the interest of justice and the protection of the public that the
roles and responsibilities of those responsible for collection be clearly
defined so that efficient and timely collection of DNA samples take place.
The purpose of this act is to assist federal, state and local criminal
justice and law enforcement agencies within and outside the state in the
detection and prosecution of individuals responsible for felony serious
crimes, as well as in the exclusion of suspects who are being investigated
for such crimes.
SECTION 3. That Section 19-5502, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:


19-5502. DEFINITIONS. (1) "CODIS" means the federal bureau of inves-
tigation's combined DNA index system that allows the storage and exchange of
DNA records submitted by state and local forensic laboratories.
(2) "Director" means the director of the Idaho state police.
(3) "DNA" means deoxyribonucleic acid.
(4) "DNA analysis" means the scientific test of a DNA sample for the
purpose of obtaining a DNA profile.
(5) "DNA profile" means the list of one (1) or more genetic types deter-
mined for an individual based on variations in DNA sequence.
(6) "DNA record" means DNA information stored in the statewide DNA
database system of the bureau of forensic services or CODIS and includes
information commonly referred to as a DNA profile.
(7) "DNA sample" means a body fluid or tissue sample provided by any
person convicted of a felony crime or any body fluid or tissue sample submit-
ted to the statewide DNA database system for analysis pursuant to a criminal
investigation or missing person investigation.
(8) "Forensic laboratory" means the bureau of forensic services of the
Idaho state police.
(9) "Law enforcement purpose" means to assist federal, state or local
criminal justice and law enforcement agencies within and outside the state
of Idaho in identification or prosecution of felony crimes or other crimes
and the identification and location of missing and unidentified persons.
(10) "Serious crimes" means any felony crime; the attempt to commit any
felony crime; any crime that requires sex offender registration pursuant
to sections 18-8304 and 18-8410, Idaho Code; domestic violence, misde-
meanor (18-918, Idaho Code); sexual exploitation by a medical care provider
(18-919, Idaho Code); sexual battery (18-924, Idaho Code); indecent ex-
posure, misdemeanor (18-4116, Idaho Code); soliciting commercial sexual
activity, misdemeanor (18-5614, Idaho Code); or stalking in the second de-
gree (18-7906, Idaho Code), regardless of the form of judgment or withheld
judgment and regardless of the sentence imposed or disposition rendered.
(10) (11) "Statewide DNA databank" means the state repository of DNA
samples collected under this chapter.
(11) (12) "Statewide DNA database system" means the DNA record system
administered by the Idaho bureau of forensic services.
SECTION 4. That Section 19-5506, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
19-5506. SCOPE OF LAW -- OFFENDERS SUBJECT TO SAMPLE COLLECTION --
EARLY COLLECTION OF SAMPLES -- RESTITUTION. (1) Any person, including any
juvenile tried as an adult, who is convicted of, or pleads guilty to, any
felony crime, the attempt to commit any felony crime or any crime that re-
quires sex offender registration pursuant to sections 18-8304 and 18-8410,
Idaho Code, regardless of the form of judgment or withheld judgment, and
regardless of the sentence imposed or disposition rendered serious crime,
as defined in section 19-5502(10), Idaho Code, shall be required to provide
to the Idaho state police a DNA sample and a right thumbprint impression, as
provided in section 19-5507, Idaho Code.
(2) Absent consent or a warrant authorizing DNA collection based upon
on probable cause, no person shall be required to provide a DNA sample unless


the person has been convicted of, or pleads guilty to, any felony crime, the
attempt to commit any felony crime or any crime that requires sex offender
registration pursuant to sections 18-8304 and 18-8410, Idaho Code a serious
crime, as defined in section 19-5502(10), Idaho Code.
(3)(a) This chapter's requirements for submission to tests and pro-
cedures for obtaining a DNA sample and thumbprint impression from the
persons who are convicted of, or who plead guilty to, any felony crime,
the attempt to commit any felony crime or any crime that requires sex
offender registration pursuant to sections 18-8304 and 18-8410, Idaho
Code, defined as a serious crime in section 19-5502(10), Idaho Code, are
mandatory and apply to those persons convicted of, or who plead guilty
to, such serious felony crimes, the attempt to commit such felony crimes
or any crime that requires sex offender registration pursuant to sec-
tions 18-8304 and 18-8410, Idaho Code, covered in this chapter prior to
its effective date, and who, as a result of the conviction or plea, are
incarcerated in a county jail facility or a penal facility, are under
probation or parole supervision or are required to register as a sex
offender pursuant to sections 18-8304 and 18-8410, Idaho Code, after
the effective date of this chapter, the attempt to commit such felony
crimes, or any crime that requires sex offender registration pursuant
to sections 18-8304 and 18-8410, Idaho Code, covered in this chapter
prior to its effective date and who, as a result of the conviction or
plea, are incarcerated in a county jail facility or a penal facility,
are under probation or parole supervision, or are required to register
as a sex offender pursuant to sections 18-8304 and 18-8410, Idaho Code,
after the effective date of this chapter.
(b) This chapter's requirements for submission to tests and procedures
for obtaining a DNA sample and thumbprint impression for persons who are
convicted of any misdemeanor crime defined as a serious crime in section
19-5502(10), Idaho Code, are mandatory, and apply only to those persons
convicted of, or who plead guilty to, such misdemeanor crimes on or af-
ter July 1, 2025.
(4) The collection of samples and impressions specified in this chap-
ter are required, regardless of whether the person previously has supplied a
DNA sample to law enforcement agencies in any other jurisdiction. The col-
lection facility is not required to collect a DNA sample if it can be verified
that a sample already exists for the individual such person in the Idaho DNA
database.
(5) The requirements of this chapter are mandatory and apply, regard-
less of whether a court advises a person that samples and impressions must be
provided to the databank and database as a condition of probation or parole.
(6) Unless the court determines that an order of restitution would be
inappropriate or undesirable, it shall order any person subject to the pro-
visions of this section to pay restitution to help offset costs incurred by
law enforcement agencies for the expense of DNA analysis.
(7) The court may order such person to pay restitution for DNA analysis
in an amount not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) per DNA sample analy-
sis, or in the aggregate not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000), regard-
less of whether:


(a) The source of the sample is the person, the victim or other persons
of interest in the case;
(b) Results of the analysis are entered into evidence in the person's
criminal case;
(c) The DNA sample was previously analyzed for another criminal case;
or
(d) Restitution for that DNA sample analysis was ordered in any other
criminal case.
(8) Law enforcement agencies entitled to restitution under this sec-
tion include the Idaho state police, county and city law enforcement agen-
cies, the office of the attorney general, county prosecuting attorneys and
city attorneys.
(9) In the case of reimbursement for DNA analysis performed by the Idaho
state police, those moneys shall be paid to the Idaho state police and de-
posited in the law enforcement fund. In the case of reimbursement to the of-
fice of the attorney general, those moneys shall be paid to the general fund.
(10) Persons who have been sentenced to death, or life without the pos-
sibility of parole, or to any life or indeterminate term are not exempt from
the requirements of this chapter.
SECTION 5. That Section 19-5507, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 6. That Chapter 55, Title 19, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 19-5507, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
19-5507. RESPONSIBILITY FOR SAMPLE COLLECTION -- TIMING OF SAMPLE
COLLECTION -- SITE FOR SAMPLE COLLECTION. (1) Process for collection. The
process for collection of DNA samples and thumbprint impressions from per-
sons subject to the provisions of this chapter shall be as provided in this
section.
(2) Order for collection at sentencing. In every case in which any
person, including any juvenile tried as an adult, has been convicted of or
pleaded guilty to a serious crime as defined in section 19-5502(10), Idaho
Code, the court shall, at time of sentencing, order the person to submit a DNA
sample and thumbprint impression for Idaho state police forensic services
and order the collection of such samples and impressions as provided in this
section.
(a) Persons released at sentencing. At the time of sentencing, the
court shall order any person, including any juvenile tried as an adult,
subject to the provisions of this chapter and who is granted probation
or other supervised or conditional release following sentencing to re-
port before the end of the following business day to provide a DNA sample
and thumbprint impression at an Idaho state police-designated sample
collection location.
(b) Persons committed to jails or other local detention facilities
at sentencing. At time of sentencing, the court shall order any per-
son subject to the provisions of this chapter and who is sentenced to
a period of incarceration in a county jail or other local detention
facility to provide a DNA sample and thumbprint impression and shall


order the chief administrative officer of such facility to cause a DNA
sample and thumbprint impression to be collected from the person as soon
as possible during the intake process at the facility, or immediately
thereafter at another facility designated for such collections, but in
all cases, no later than ten (10) days after the person's arrival at the
facility.
(c) Persons committed to the departments of correction or juvenile cor-
rections at sentencing.
(i) At time of sentencing, the court shall order any person who
comes within the terms of this chapter and who is committed to the
custody of the department of correction or department of juve-
nile corrections to submit a DNA sample and thumbprint impression
as directed by the director of the department of correction or
department of juvenile corrections and shall order the director
of the department of correction or department of juvenile cor-
rections to cause a DNA sample and thumbprint impression to be
collected from any such person during the intake process at the
reception center designated by the director of the department of
correction or juvenile correction as soon as possible, but in any
event no later than ten (10) days following arrival at the insti-
tution.
(ii) Any person subject to the provisions of this chapter who is
serving a term of imprisonment or confinement, and who did not,
for any reason, provide a DNA sample or thumbprint impression for
analysis by Idaho state police forensic services, shall submit
to such tests as soon as practicable, but in any event prior to
final discharge, parole, or release from imprisonment or confine-
ment. The director of the department of correction or department
of juvenile corrections shall cause the sample and impression to
be collected within ten (10) days of receiving notice from Idaho
state police forensic services that the person has not previously
submitted a sample and impression. A person who was convicted
prior to July 1, 2025, is not exempt from these requirements.
(3) Collection prior to sentencing. Where a person subject to the pro-
visions of this chapter has been convicted or has pleaded guilty, but is not
yet sentenced, the prosecuting attorney, attorney general, or Idaho state
police may apply for an order requiring the person to submit to collection of
a DNA sample and thumbprint impression prior to sentencing. The court shall
order a sample and impression to be taken prior to sentencing upon a show-
ing that early collection of such samples is in the best interest of justice.
The DNA samples shall be collected in accordance with procedures established
by the bureau of forensic services. The director may designate a state or
county correctional facility for sample collection.
(4) Incarcerated persons who have not submitted a DNA sample or
thumbprint impression. Any person subject to the provisions of this chapter
who is serving a term of imprisonment or confinement, and who did not, for any
reason, provide a DNA sample or thumbprint impression for analysis by Idaho
state police forensic services, shall submit such sample and impression and
the administrator of the prison, jail, or other facility in which such person
is confined shall cause the sample and impression to be collected as soon as


practicable, but in any event no later than ten (10) days following notice
from Idaho state police forensic services that the person has not previously
submitted the sample and impression, or prior to final discharge from pro-
bation, parole, or release from imprisonment or confinement, whichever is
earlier. A person who was convicted prior to July 1, 2025, is not exempt from
these requirements.
(5) Persons on parole following incarceration. As a condition of pa-
role, any person subject to the provisions of this chapter and who has not
previously provided a DNA sample and thumbprint impression shall, upon no-
tice by Idaho state police forensic services, a law enforcement agency, or
an agent of the department of correction be required to provide a DNA sam-
ple and thumbprint impression if it has been determined that such sample and
thumbprint impression are not in the possession of Idaho state police foren-
sic services. Such person shall be required to have the sample and impres-
sion taken within ten (10) working days at an Idaho state police sample col-
lection location.
(6) Persons who are returned to state or local correctional facilities.
Any person who: is subject to the provisions of this chapter, including any
juvenile tried as an adult; is released on parole, furlough, or other release
and returned to a state or local juvenile or adult correctional institution
for a violation of a condition of such release; and has not previously pro-
vided a DNA sample and thumbprint impression shall provide a sample and im-
pression upon returning to the state or local correctional institution. The
chief administrative officer of such facility shall cause the sample and im-
pression to be taken as soon as possible, but no later than ten (10) days fol-
lowing notice from Idaho state police forensic services or discovery that
the person has not yet provided a sample and impression, or prior to final
discharge, parole, or release from imprisonment or confinement, whichever
is earlier.
(7)(a) Persons in Idaho pursuant to interstate agreement. When the
state accepts an offender from another state under any interstate com-
pact or under any other reciprocal agreement with any county, state,
or federal agency, or any other provision of law, whether or not the
offender is confined or released, the acceptance shall be conditional
on the offender providing a DNA sample and thumbprint impression if the
offender was convicted of an offense that would qualify as a serious
crime, as defined in section 19-5502(10), Idaho Code, if committed in
this state, or if the offender was convicted of an equivalent offense in
any other jurisdiction.
(b) If the offender from another state is not confined, the offender
shall provide the sample and impression required by this chapter within
ten (10) days after the offender reports to the supervising agent or
within ten (10) days of notice to the offender from Idaho state police
forensic services, any law enforcement agency or the offender's super-
vising agency, whichever occurs first. The offender shall report to an
Idaho state police-designated sample collection facility to have the
sample and impression taken.
(c) If the offender from another state is confined in a state, county,
or local correctional facility, the offender shall provide, and the
administrative officer of such facility shall cause to be collected,


the DNA sample and thumbprint impression as soon as practicable, but no
later than ten (10) days after receipt into such facility, or within ten
(10) days following notice from Idaho state police forensic services
that the person has not yet provided a sample and impression, or before
completion of the offender's term of imprisonment, or before the of-
fender is to be discharged from the facility, whichever is earlier.
(8) The collection facility and sex offender registration location
shall verify that the person's DNA sample has been collected in Idaho. The
collection facility shall not be required to collect a DNA sample if it can be
verified that a sample already exists for the person in the Idaho DNA data-
base.
SECTION 7. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.